Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 5. Transportation Trust Fund.
§ 33.2-1526.6.
Commonwealth Aviation Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be part of the Transportation Trust Fund and shall be known as the Commonwealth Aviation Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and any funds remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on the funds shall be credited to the Fund. The funds shall be allocated by the Board to the Virginia Aviation Board, to be allocated by the Virginia Aviation Board to any Virginia airport that is owned by the Commonwealth, a governmental subdivision thereof, or a private entity to which the public has access for the purposes enumerated in § 5.1-2.16, or is owned or leased by the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority (MWAA), as set forth in subsection B:

Any new funds in excess of $12.1 million that are available for allocation by the Virginia Aviation Board shall be allocated as follows: 40 percent to air carrier airports as provided in subdivision 1 and 60 percent to MWAA, up to a maximum annual amount of $2 million. Except for adjustments due to changes in enplaned passengers, no air carrier airport sponsor, excluding MWAA, shall receive less funds identified under subdivision 1 than it received in fiscal year 1994—1995.Of the remaining amount:

Forty percent of the funds shall be allocated to air carrier airports that are not airports owned or leased by MWAA, based upon the percentage of enplanements for each airport to total enplanements at all air carrier airports that are not airports owned or leased by MWAA. No air carrier airport sponsor shall receive less than $50,000 nor more than $2 million per year from this provision.

Sixty percent of the funds shall be allocated as follows:

For the first six months of each fiscal year, the funds shall be allocated as follows:

Forty percent of the funds shall be allocated by the Virginia Aviation Board for air carrier and reliever airports on a discretionary basis, except airports owned or leased by MWAA; and

Twenty percent of the funds shall be allocated by the Virginia Aviation Board for general aviation airports on a discretionary basis; and

For the second six months of each fiscal year, all remaining funds shall be allocated by the Virginia Aviation Board for all eligible airports on a discretionary basis, except airports owned or leased by MWAA.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, Item 432 G, as added by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “G. Notwithstanding the provisions of
§

33.2-1526.6

.B.1, Code of Virginia, during fiscal year 2021 and fiscal year 2022, the Virginia Aviation Board may increase the funds to any airport identified in subsection B of
§

33.2-1526.6

by no more than 20 percent, based on demonstrated need provided by the airport requesting additional funds. The Department of Aviation shall adopt guidelines setting out criteria for eligibility for additional funding.”

§ 33.2-1526.7.
Commonwealth Space Flight Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be a part of the Commonwealth Transportation Fund and shall be known as the Commonwealth Space Flight Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and the funds remaining in such Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The amounts allocated to the Commonwealth Space Flight Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

shall be allocated by the Board to the Board of Directors of the Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority to be used to support the capital needs, maintenance, and operating costs of any and all facilities owned and operated by the Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority.

Commonwealth Space Flight Fund revenue shall be allocated by the Board of Directors to the Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority in order to foster and stimulate the growth of the commercial space flight industry in Virginia.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-1527.
Priority Transportation Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Priority Transportation Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. All funds as may be designated in the appropriation act for deposit to the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Such funds shall include:

Beginning with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, and for fiscal years thereafter, all revenues that exceed the official forecast, pursuant to §

2.2-1503

, for (i) the allocation to the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established in §

33.2-1530

as set forth in §

33.2-1524

and (ii) the allocation to highway and mass transit improvement projects as set forth in §

33.2-1524.1

, but not including any amounts that are allocated to the Commonwealth Port Fund and the Commonwealth Aviation Fund under such section;

All revenues deposited into the Fund pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

33.2-1524.1

;

All revenues deposited into the Fund pursuant to §

33.2-226

; and

Any other such funds as may be transferred, allocated, or appropriated.All moneys in the Fund shall first be used for debt service payments on bonds or obligations for which the Fund is expressly required for making debt service payments, to the extent needed. The Fund shall be considered a part of the Transportation Trust Fund. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes enumerated in subsection B. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller.

The Board shall use the Fund to facilitate the financing of priority transportation projects throughout the Commonwealth. The Board may use the Fund by (i) expending amounts therein on such projects directly; (ii) payment to any authority, locality, commission, or other entity for the purpose of paying the costs thereof; or (iii) using such amounts to support, secure, or leverage financing for such projects. No expenditures from or other use of amounts in the Fund shall be considered in allocating highway maintenance and construction funds under §

33.2-358

or apportioning Transportation Trust Fund funds under §

58.1-638

but shall be in addition thereto. The Board shall use the Fund to facilitate the financing of priority transportation projects as designated by the General Assembly, provided that at the discretion of the Board funds allocated to projects within a transportation district may be allocated among projects within the same transportation district as needed to meet construction cash-flow needs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, beginning July 1, 2007, no bonds, obligations, or other evidences of debt (the bonds) that expressly require as a source for debt service payments or for the repayment of such bonds the revenues of the Fund shall be issued or entered into, unless at the time of the issuance the revenues then in the Fund or reasonably anticipated to be deposited into the Fund pursuant to the law then in effect are by themselves sufficient to make 100 percent of the contractually required debt service payments on all such bonds, including any interest related thereto and the retirement of such bonds.

History.

2000, cc. 1019, 1044, § 33.1-23.03:8; 2007, c. 896; 2013, c. 766; 2014, c. 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, substituted “(the Fund)” for “hereafter referred to as” in subsection A; inserted “the allocation to” preceding “the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund” and inserted “as set forth in §

33.2-1524

” following “§

33.2-1530

” in clause (i) of subdivision A 1; substituted “§

33.2-1524.1

” for “§

33.2-1526

” and substituted “Aviation” for “Airport” in clause (ii) of subdivision A 1; substituted “subdivision 7 of §

33.2-1524.1

” for “§

58.1-2531

” in subdivision A 2; substituted “§

33.2-226

” for “subsection E of §

58.1-2289

” in subdivision A 3; and made minor stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Funds set aside in Virginia Transportation Act for Southeast Bypass around the City of Harrisonburg

are to be spent solely on planning, engineering and construction of the bypass and may not be expended to improve roads along bypass corridor and alternatives to bypass. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Christopher B. Saxman, Member, House of Delegates, 02-100, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 161 (12/11/02) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1528.
Concession Payments Account.

Concession payments to the Commonwealth deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund pursuant to subdivision B 2 of §

33.2-1524

from qualifying transportation facilities developed and/or operated pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.) shall be held in a separate subaccount to be designated the Concession Payments Account, (the Account) together with all interest, dividends, and appreciation that accrue to the Account and that are not otherwise specifically directed by law or reserved by the Board for other purposes allowed by law.

The Board may make allocations from the Account upon such terms and subject to such conditions as the Board deems appropriate to:

Pay or finance all or part of the costs of programs or projects, including the costs of planning, operation, maintenance, and improvements incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of projects, provided that allocations from the Account shall be limited to programs and projects that are reasonably related to or benefit the users of the qualifying transportation facility that was the subject of a concession pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.). The priorities of metropolitan planning organizations, planning district commissions, local governments, and transportation corridors shall be considered by the Board in making project allocations from moneys in the Account.

Repay funds from the Toll Facilities Revolving Account or the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund.

Pay the Board’s reasonable costs and expenses incurred in the administration and management of the Account.

Concession payments to the Commonwealth for a qualifying transportation facility located within the boundaries of a rapid rail project for which a federal Record of Decision has been issued shall be held in a subaccount separate from the Concession Payments Account together with all interest, dividends, and appreciation that accrue to the subaccount. The Board may make allocations from the subaccount as the Board deems appropriate to:

Pay or finance all or part of the costs of planning, design, land acquisition, and improvements incurred in connection with the construction of such rapid rail project consistent with the issued federal Record of Decision, as may be revised; and

Upon determination by the Board that sufficient funds are or will be available to meet the schedule for construction of such rapid rail project, pay or finance all or part of the costs of planning, design, land acquisition, and improvements incurred in connection with other highway and public transportation projects within the corridor of the rapid rail project or within the boundaries of the qualifying transportation facility. In the case of highway projects, the Board shall follow an approval process generally in accordance with subsection B of §

33.2-208

.

The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed to the end that its beneficial purposes may be effectuated. Insofar as this provision is inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special, or local law, this provision shall be controlling.

History.

2006, c. 922, § 33.1-23.03:9; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 709; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 709 deleted former subsection E pertaining to severability.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “subdivision B 2” for “subdivision 7” in subsection A.

§ 33.2-1529.
Toll Facilities Revolving Account.

All definitions of terms in this section shall be as set forth in the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.).

Subject to any obligations to existing bondholders, but notwithstanding §§

2.2-1806

and

58.1-13

, funds deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

33.2-1524

shall be held in a separate subaccount to be designated the Toll Facilities Revolving Account (the Account). In addition, any funds received from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof that, pursuant to federal law, may be made available, as loans or otherwise, to private persons or entities for transportation purposes, hereinafter referred to as “federal funds,” shall be deposited in a segregated subaccount within the Account. Payments received with respect to any loan made from such segregated subaccount pursuant to subdivision D 2 shall also be deposited into such segregated subaccount in the Account.

User fees collected in excess of the annual debt service, operations, and maintenance expenses and necessary administrative costs including any obligations to the Account and any other obligations for qualifying facilities with respect to which an agency of the Commonwealth is the responsible public entity shall be deposited and held in the Regional Toll Facilities Revolving Subaccount, (the Regional Account), together with all interest, dividends, and appreciation for use within the metropolitan planning organization region within which the facility exists. Payments received with respect to any loan made from such Regional Account pursuant to subdivision D 3 shall also be deposited into the Regional Account.

The Board may make allocations upon such terms and subject to such conditions as the Board deems appropriate from the following funds for the following purposes:

From any funds in the Account, exclusive of those in the Regional Account, to pay or finance all or part of the costs, including the cost of planning, operation, maintenance, and improvements, incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of projects financed in whole or in part as toll facilities or to refinance existing toll facilities, provided that any such funds allocated from the Account for a planned or operating toll facility shall be considered as an advance of funding for which the Account shall be reimbursed;

From funds in the segregated subaccount in the Account into which federal funds are deposited in conjunction with the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.) and pursuant to the terms of a comprehensive agreement between a responsible public entity and a private operator as provided for in that act:

To make a loan to such operator to pay any cost of a qualifying transportation facility, provided that (i) the operator’s return on its investment is limited to a reasonable rate and (ii) such loan is limited to a reasonable term; or

To pay the Commonwealth’s or its agency’s portion of costs incurred or to be incurred in accordance with a comprehensive agreement with respect to a transportation facility;

From funds in the Regional Account:

To pay or finance all or part of the costs, including the cost of planning, operation, maintenance, and improvements incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of projects financed in whole or in part as toll facilities or to refinance existing toll facilities, provided that (i) allocations from the Regional Account shall be limited to projects located within the same metropolitan planning organization region as the facility that generated the excess revenue and (ii) any such funds allocated from the Regional Account for a planned or operating toll facility shall be considered as an advance of funding for which the Regional Account shall be reimbursed; or

To pay the Commonwealth’s, its agency’s, or its political subdivision’s costs incurred or to be incurred in accordance with a comprehensive agreement with respect to a transportation facility within the same metropolitan planning organization region as the facility that generated the excess revenue; and

From any funds in the Account or Regional Account, to pay the Board’s reasonable costs and expenses incurred in (i) the administration and management of the Account, (ii) its program of financing or refinancing costs of toll facilities, and (iii) the making of loans and paying of costs described in subdivisions 1 and 2.

The Board may transfer from the Account to the Transportation Trust Fund for allocation pursuant to §

33.2-358

or the Virginia Transportation Infrastructure Bank pursuant to Article 1 (§

33.2-1500

et seq.) any interest revenues and, subject to applicable federal limitations, federal funds not committed by the Board to the purposes provided for in subsection D.

The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed to the end that its beneficial purposes may be effectuated. Insofar as this provision is inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special, or local law, this provision shall be controlling.

History.

1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, § 33.1-23.03:4; 1995, cc. 545, 576; 1997, c. 501; 2014, c. 805; 2015, cc. 684, 709.

Cross references.

As to goals of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation, generally, see §

2.2-229

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “subdivision A 3 of
§

33.2-1524

” for “subdivision 3 of
§

33.2-1524

” to conform to Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “together with all interest, dividends, and appreciation that accrue to the Transportation Trust Fund and that are not otherwise specifically directed by law or reserved by the Board in the resolution authorizing issuance of bonds to finance toll facilities” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B; substituted “§

33.2-358

or the Virginia Transportation Infrastructure Bank pursuant to Article 1 (§

33.2-1500

et seq.)” for “subsection C of §

33.2-358

” in subsection E, and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment by c. 709 deleted former subsection G pertaining to severability.

§ 33.2-1529.1.
Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund.

There is hereby created the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund (the Fund) to be used by the Governor to provide funds to address the transportation aspects of economic development opportunities. The Fund shall consist of (i) funds pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

33.2-1524

and (ii) any funds appropriated to it by the general appropriation act and revenue from any other source, public or private. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller, and any funds remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. All interest and dividends that are earned on the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. The Governor shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations, Finance, and Transportation and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation as funds are awarded in accordance with this section.

The Fund shall be a subfund of the Transportation Trust Fund. Provisions of this title and Title 58.1 relating to the allocations or disbursements of proceeds of the Commonwealth Transportation Fund, the Transportation Trust Fund, or the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund shall not apply to the Fund.

Funds shall be awarded from the Fund by the Governor as grants, revolving loans, or other financing tools and equity contributions to an agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth. Loans shall be approved by the Governor and made in accordance with procedures established by the Board and approved by the Comptroller. Loans shall be interest-free and shall be repaid to the Fund. The Governor may establish the duration of any loan, but such term shall not exceed seven years. The Department shall be responsible for monitoring repayment of such loans and reporting the receivables to the Comptroller as required.

Grants or revolving loans may be used for transportation capacity development on and off site; road, rail, mass transit, or other transportation access costs beyond the funding capability of existing programs; studies of transportation projects, including environmental analysis, geotechnical assessment, survey, design and engineering, advance right-of-way acquisition, traffic analysis, toll sensitivity studies, and financial analysis; or anything else permitted by law. Funds may be used for any transportation project or any transportation facility. Any transportation infrastructure completed with moneys from the Fund shall not become private property, and the results of any studies or analysis completed as a result of a grant or loan from the Fund shall be property of the Commonwealth.

The Board, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation and the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, shall develop guidelines and criteria that shall be used in awarding grants or making loans from the Fund; however, no grant shall exceed $5 million and no loan shall exceed $30 million. No grant or loan shall be awarded until the Governor has provided copies of the guidelines and criteria to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations, Finance, and Transportation and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation. The guidelines and criteria shall include provisions including the number of jobs and amounts of investment that must be committed in the event moneys are being used for an economic development project, a statement of how the studies and analysis to be completed using moneys from the Fund will advance the development of a transportation facility, a process for the application for and review of grant and loan requests, a timeframe for completion of any work, the comparative benefit resulting from the development of a transportation project, assessment of the ability of the recipient to repay any loan funds, and other criteria as necessary to support the timely development of transportation projects. The criteria shall also include incentives to encourage matching funds from any other local, federal, or private source.

Within 30 days of each six-month period ending June 30 and December 31, the Governor shall provide a report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations, Finance, and Transportation and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation that shall include the following information: the locality in which the project is being developed, the amount of the grant or loan made or committed from the Fund and the purpose for which it will be used, the number of jobs created or projected to be created, and the amount of a company’s investment in the Commonwealth if the project is part of an economic development opportunity.

The Governor shall provide grants and commitments from the Fund in an amount not to exceed the total value of the moneys contained in the Fund. If the Governor commits funds for years beyond the fiscal years covered under the existing appropriation act, the State Treasurer shall set aside and reserve the funds the Governor has committed, and the funds set aside and reserved shall remain in the Fund for those future fiscal years. No grant or loan shall be payable in the years beyond the existing appropriation act unless the funds are currently available in the Fund.

History.

2015, c. 684; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation” for “Senate Committees on Finance and Transportation.” March 10, 2021.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, substituted “funds pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

33.2-1524

” for “one-third of all interest, dividends, and appreciation that may accrue to the Transportation Trust Fund and the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund” in clause (i) of subsection A